Arkansas, session 2025, HB1446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-85-302 is amended to read as follows:
6-85-302. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Approved institution of higher education” means an
institution of higher education approved by the Division of Higher Education
to participate in the Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarship Program and
that is:
(A) A state-supported two-year or four-year college or
university; or
(B) A private, nonprofit two-year or four-year college or
university with its primary headquarters located in Arkansas that is eligible
to receive Title IV federal student aid funds;
*CRH147*
02-25-2025 09:21:36 CRH147

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/20/25 H2/25/25 HB1446
(C) A public or private vocational-technical school that
is:
(i) Eligible to receive Title IV federal student aid
funds;
(ii) Included on the Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act eligible training provider list;
(iii) Qualified to receive approval for veteran's
education benefits from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(iv) Included on the State Board of Private Career
Education list; or
(D) A public or private technical institute that is:
(i) Eligible to receive Title IV federal student aid
funds;
(ii) Included on the Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act eligible training provider list;
(iii) Qualified to receive approval for veteran's
education benefits from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(iv) Included on the State Board of Private Career
Education list; and
(2)(A) “Certificate program” means a program that is offered or
made available to a student by an approved institution of higher education
that leads to the obtainment of a certification or license, including without
limitation a program operated or sponsored by a third party.
(B) The credit hours or contact hours awarded for a certificate
program may include credit hours or contact hours that are not creditable
toward an associate or a baccalaureate degree.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-85-304 is amended to read as follows:
6-85-304. Eligibility.
(a) A student is eligible to receive an Arkansas Workforce Challenge
Scholarship for an academic year if the student applies to the Division of
Higher Education by a date determined by the Division of Higher Education
preceding the academic year and:
(1) Is an Arkansas resident or, if the student is less than
twenty-one (21) years of age, either the student or one (1) parent of the
student is an Arkansas resident;
02-25-2025 09:21:36 CRH147

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/20/25 H2/25/25 HB1446
(2) Is a citizen of the United States or is a lawful permanent
resident;
(3) Meets either of the following requirements:
(A) Graduated from a:
(i) Public high school in Arkansas or another state;
(ii) Private high school in Arkansas or another
state; or
(iii) Home school under § 6-15-501 et seq. or
recognized by another state; or
(B) Received a high school equivalency diploma approved by
the Adult Education Section or another state;
(3)(4) Is not receiving a scholarship under the Arkansas
Academic Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-201 et seq.;
(4)(5) Is accepted for admission in a program of study at an
approved institution of higher education or a private trade school licensed
to do business in Arkansas that leads to an associate degree or a certificate
program that results in a portable license or certificate in one (1) of the
following high-demand fields:
(A) Industry Manufacturing;
(B) Health care trades or professions not eligible for a
scholarship award under the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program,
§ 6-85-201 et seq.; and
(C) Information technology; and
(D) Construction trades; and
(E) Logistics and distribution; and
(5)(A)(6) Whose program of study or certificate program will result in
the student's being qualified to work in an occupation identified by the
Division of Higher Education, in consultation with the Division of Workforce
Services under subdivision (a)(5)(B)(i) of this section.
(B)(i) The Division of Workforce Services shall provide
annually to the Division of Higher Education by March 1 a list that
identifies the five (5) most in-demand occupations in this state in each
high-demand field under subdivision (a)(4) of this section that require the
completion of a program of study that leads to an associate degree or a
certificate program.
(ii) The Division of Workforce Services shall publish
02-25-2025 09:21:36 CRH147

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/20/25 H2/25/25 HB1446
on its website the list under subdivision (a)(5)(B)(i) of this section and
data supporting the list.
(b)(1) A student who received a scholarship under this subchapter and
successfully completed a program of study or certificate program that meets
the requirements under subdivision (a)(4) of this section is eligible to
reapply for a scholarship under this subchapter if the student is accepted
for admission in a different program of study or certificate program that
meets the requirements under subdivision (a)(4) of this section.
(2) A student who received a scholarship under this subchapter
and does not successfully complete the program of study or certificate
program is eligible to reapply for and receive a scholarship one (1) time
only.
(b) An instructor of the program of study or certificate program under
subdivision (a)(6) of this section is required to be licensed or certified in
the subject he or she teaches.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-85-305(b), concerning the award amounts
distributed under the Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarship Program, is
amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The division shall distribute scholarships from the funds
available in an equal amount to every student eligible to receive a
scholarship under this subchapter not to exceed ten million dollars
($10,000,000) in total awards.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the
maximum scholarship award a student may receive in an academic year shall be
the lesser of:
(A) Eight hundred dollars ($800) Two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500); or
(B)(i) The cost of the certificate program or program of
study.
(ii) The cost of a certificate program or program of
study shall include:
(a) Tuition, fees, or other charges;
(b) Textbooks or other course materials; and
(c) Equipment needed for a course.
(3) The scholarship awards may be used for expenses included in
02-25-2025 09:21:36 CRH147

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/20/25 H2/25/25 HB1446
the cost of the certificate program or program of study.
(4) A scholarship under this section shall be only for the
academic year for which it is awarded.
(5) If the program of study or certificate program extends
beyond an academic year, a student who is making sufficient progress may
carry over any unspent portion of the scholarship.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-85-307 is amended to read as follows:
6-85-307. Rules.
The Division of Higher Education, in consultation with the Division of
Workforce Services, shall promulgate rules to implement this subchapter.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 85, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-85-308. Reporting.
(a) An approved institution of higher education or certificate program
accepting funds under this subchapter shall submit an annual report to the
Division of Higher Education that includes without limitation the following:
(1) The number of students who graduate with a degree, license,
or certification from the approved institution of higher education;
(2) A comparison of the enrollment data and graduation data;
(3) Job placement statistics;
(4) Starting salaries of graduates; and
(5) Student information required to be provided to the division
under § 6-85-216.
(b) The division shall submit the annual report required under
subsection (a) of this section to the:
(1) House Committee on Education;
(2) Senate Committee on Education; and
(3) Lottery Oversight Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

SECTION 6. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
(a) When adopting the initial rules required under this act, the
Division of Higher Education shall file the final rules with the Secretary of
State for adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before ninety (90) days from the effective date of
02-25-2025 09:21:36 CRH147

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/20/25 H2/25/25 HB1446
this act; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by ninety (90)
days from the effective date of this act, as soon as practicable after
approval under § 10-3-309.
(b) The division shall file the proposed rules with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of ninety (90) days from
the effective date of this act, so that the Legislative Council may consider
the rules for approval before ninety (90) days from the effective date of
this act.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Constitution,
Article 19, § 14 was amended by Issue 1 of 2024 to allow state lottery
proceeds to fund vocational or technical school scholarships for Arkansans;
that there are workforce needs within the state, and the current law needs to
be amended immediately in order to effectuate this change voted for by the
people that would allow Arkansans to benefit from this change in the use of
lottery proceeds; and that this act is immediately necessary because the
process and procedures to distribute these scholarships need to be updated as
quickly as possible in order to provide scholarship funding for Arkansans
that would allow them to receive training and join the workforce of the
state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Lundstrum




02-25-2025 09:21:36 CRH147